Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,108
Cancellation of certificate of authority; effect of failure to have certificate.

(1) To cancel its certificate of authority to transact business in this state, a foreign limited cooperative association shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a notice of cancellation. The certificate is canceled when the notice becomes effective under section 21-2919.

(2) A foreign limited cooperative association transacting business in this state shall not maintain an action or proceeding in this state unless it has a certificate of authority to transact business in this state.

(3) The failure of a foreign limited cooperative association to have a certificate of authority to transact business in this state does not impair the validity of a contract or act of the foreign limited cooperative association or prevent the foreign limited cooperative association from defending an action or proceeding in this state.

(4) A member of a foreign limited cooperative association is not liable for the obligations of the foreign limited cooperative association solely by reason of the foreign limited cooperative association's having transacted business in this state without a certificate of authority.

(5) If a foreign limited cooperative association transacts business in this state without a certificate of authority or cancels its certificate of authority, it may be served in accordance with section 21-2916 for rights of action arising out of the transaction of business in this state.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 108.